South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5507.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 11, Title 8 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 8-11-158.  (A) For the purposes of this section: (1) "Eligible school district employee" means an employee defined by the Department of Education using the Professional Certified Staff system or any full-time equivalent position categorized as classified staff. (2) "Eligible state employee" means an employee occupying any percentage of a full-time equivalent position for this State or any of its political subdivisions. (3) "Qualifying event" means the time period each month when menstruation occurs. (B)(1) An eligible school district employee or eligible state employee is entitled to two days of paid leave each month during a qualifying event. (2) If the leave is not used by the eligible state employee before the end of each month, such leave does not accumulate for subsequent use. Paid leave provided by this section may not be donated. Any leave remaining at the end of each month is forfeited. (3) Days of paid leave taken under this section must be taken consecutively. (4) Legal holidays pursuant to Section 53-5-10, school district holidays, and vacation on the district calendar, as applicable, must not be counted against the paid leave provided by this section. (C) The Division of Human Resources of the Department of Administration and the State Board of Education shall promulgate regulations, guidance, and procedures to implement this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect on July 1, 2026. ----XX----